District of Columbia statutes.
28-2104

Bond of assignee.

Immediately upon the filing for record of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, the assignee shall execute and file in the clerk’s office of the court having probate jurisdiction his bond to the United States, in an amount and with security to be approved by a judge thereof, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties according to law, and the court may from time to time require the assignee, or a trustee appointed in his place, to give additional security when required by the interests of the creditors.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 668, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 151(a)
Civil jurisdiction, probate, see §§ 11-501 and 11-921.
This section is referenced in § 28-2105.
1981 Ed., § 28-2104.
1973 Ed., § 28-2104.